Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB328.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in City of Harrisburg, Dauphin County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to Susquehanna Regional Transportation Authority certain lands and buildings situate in the City of Harrisburg, Dauphin County, for fair market value, as determined by an appraisal, under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 2.857 acres and improvements thereon, bounded and more particularly described as follows:ALL THAT CERTAIN tract of land situate in the City of 12345678910111213141516171819 Harrisburg, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania, being more fully bounded and described as follows, to wit:Beginning at a 5/8" rebar set on the eastern legal right-of-way line of North Cameron Street, and being South 15 degrees 16 minutes 47 seconds East for a distance of 300.91 feet from the southerly right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive;THENCE North 60 degrees 52 minutes 36 seconds East for a distance of 123.71 feet to a point on the eastern legal right-of-way line of Florence Street;THENCE along the eastern legal right-of-way line of Florence Street, North 15 degrees 16 minutes 55 seconds West for a distance of 271.31 feet to a 5/8" rebar found at the intersection of the southern legal right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive and the eastern legal right-of-way line of Florence Street;THENCE along the southern legal right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive, North 74 degrees 43 minutes 05 seconds East for a distance of 384.00 feet to a 5/8" rebar at the intersection of the southern legal right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive and the western legal right-of-way line of Dr. Claude E. Nichols Street;THENCE along the western legal right-of-way line of Dr. Claude E. Nichols Street, South 15 degrees 16 minutes 55 seconds East for a distance of 176.70 feet to a 5/8" rebar set;THENCE North 60 degrees 52 minutes 36 seconds East for a distance of 33.78 feet to a 5/8" rebar set on the line of lands of the Harrisburg Cemetery Association;THENCE along the lands of the Harrisburg Cemetery Association, South 16 degrees 39 minutes 58 seconds East for a distance of 61.58 feet to a point in the State Street Ramp from North Cameron Street to 13th Street;20250SB0328PN0304 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THENCE in and through the said State Street Ramp, South 58 degrees 58 minutes 47 seconds West for a distance of 559.38 feet to a point on the eastern legal right-of-way line of North Cameron Street;THENCE along the eastern legal right-of-way line of North Cameron Street, North 15 degrees 16 minutes 47 seconds West for a distance of 81.00 feet to the place of beginning.Containing 2.857 acres or 124,449 square feet, gross.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, highway rights-of-way, including, without limitation, the right-of-way for the State Street Bridge, SR 3014, and the right-of-way for the ramp to 13th Street adjoining such bridge, SR 3028, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under this act shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed under this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately 20250SB0328PN0304 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(g) Deed of conveyance.--The conveyance shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(h) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(i) Alternate disposition.--In the event that this conveyance is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(j) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0328PN0304 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627